Utah statutes.
13-10a-4.   Notification of rights.
No performing rights society or organization may enter into, or offer to enter
into, a contract for the payment of royalties by a proprietor unless at the
time of the offer, or any time thereafter, but no later than 72 hours prior to
the execution of the contract, it provides to the proprietor, in writing, a
schedule of the rates and terms of royalties under the contract, including:
(1)  any sliding scale, discounts, or reductions in fees on any basis for
which the proprietor may be eligible; and
(2)  any scheduled increases or decreases in fees during the term of the
contract.
